California, session 20252026, AB2183.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11501 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:11501. The purposes of this division and Chapter 1 1.5 (commencing with Section 12501), Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12751), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 14001), and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 14101) of Division 7 are as follows:(a) To provide for the proper, safe, and efficient use of pesticides essential for the production of food and fiber and for the protection of the public health and safety.(b) To protect the environment from environmentally harmful pesticides by prohibiting, regulating, or ensuring proper stewardship of those pesticides.(c) To assure the agricultural and pest control workers of safe working conditions where pesticides are present.(d) To permit agricultural pest control by competent and responsible licensees and permittees under strict control of the director and commissioners.(e) To assure consumers and users that pesticides are properly labeled and are appropriate for the use designated by the label and that state or local governmental dissemination of information on pesticidal uses of any registered pesticide product is consistent with the uses for which the product is registered.(f) To encourage the development and implementation of pest management systems, stressing application of biological and cultural pest control techniques with selective pesticides when necessary to achieve acceptable levels of control with the least possible harm to nontarget organisms and the environment.